Connecticut, session 2026, SB00455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding any
provision of the general statutes, any farming that occurs on any state-
owned property, including, but not limited to, any property under the
care, custody or control of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, shall be overseen by the Department of
Agriculture. Any lease agreement for any such farming shall, upon
renewal of such lease agreement, be entered into between the
Department of Agriculture and the respective lessor.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
LCO No. 2420 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 455